Georgia statutes. 
Cited in DOT v. City of Atlanta, 255 Ga. 124, 337 S.E.2d 327 (1985).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Lease to private entity prohibited absent express authority. - Property held by a municipality for the public use and the benefit of the municipality's citizens cannot be leased to a private entity without express legislative authority, in the absence of other applicable exceptions. 1992 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U92-9.

Sale of donated property exempted. - Disposition of real property donated to a municipality upon the approved condition for use as a hospital is excepted by O.C.G.A. § 36-37-2 from the sealed bid or auction procedure of O.C.G.A. § 36-37-6; however, city officials must exercise the utmost good faith, fidelity, and integrity to obtain the best price in any sale of the property. 1984 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U84-20.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 14 Am. Jur. 2d, Cemeteries, §§ 3, 9. 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 485 et seq., 515.

C.J.S. - 63 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1152 et seq., 1162. 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2493.

ALR. - Sufficiency of compliance with condition of sale or lease by municipality of public utility plants, 52 A.L.R. 1052.

Lease of property by municipality or other political subdivision, with option to purchase same, as evasion of constitutional or statutory limitation of indebtedness, 71 A.L.R. 1318; 145 A.L.R. 1362.

Lease or sale of municipal plant or contract therefor as affecting right of municipality to compete, 118 A.L.R. 1030.

Implied or inherent power of municipal corporation to sell its real property, 141 A.L.R. 1447.

Right and capacity of taxpayer to attack sale by municipal corporation or other taxing unit of its property, 17 A.L.R.2d 475.

Power of municipal corporation to exchange its real property, 60 A.L.R.2d 220.

Power of municipality to sell, lease, or mortgage public utility plant or interest therein, 61 A.L.R.2d 595.

What constitutes newspaper of "general circulation" within meaning of state statutes requiring publication of official notices and the like in such newspaper, 24 A.L.R.4th 822.

36-37-6.1. Sale, exchange, lease, or grant of easement over property used for recreational purposes by incorporated municipalities having population greater than 300,000.

Statute text

(a) This Code section shall be applicable to incorporated municipalities of the State of Georgia having a population of more than 300,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1960 or any future such census.

(b) All such municipalities shall have authority to sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property comprising parks, playgrounds, golf courses, swimming pools, or other like property used primarily for recreational purposes, provided that nothing in this Code section shall have the effect of authorizing alienation where such would be in derogation of rights, duties, and obligations imposed by prior deed, contract, or like document of similar import or where such alienation would cause divesting of title to a park, playground, golf course, swimming pool, or other like property that had been dedicated to public use and not subsequently abandoned.

(c) (1) All such municipalities shall have authority to lease out and grant easements over property used primarily for recreational purposes to others consistent with general park and recreational purposes for a period not exceeding 50 years and for a valuable consideration. Any such recreational property which was formerly used for annual regional fair purposes but is no longer so used may be leased by any such municipality to one or more private entities for terms of not more than 50 years each for development and use as motion picture and television production, processing, and related facilities together with all such support and service facilities as are necessary or convenient to such use.

(2) All such municipalities shall have authority to enter into contracts and renewals and extensions of contracts for the cooperative operation, maintenance, cooperative management, and funding of property which in no way limits the governance or the policy role of said municipalities which property is used primarily for recreational purposes consistent with general park and recreational purposes, for periods not exceeding ten years and for a valuable consideration.

History

(Ga. L. 1967, p. 3022, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 3196, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-37-6.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 40; Ga. L. 1991, p. 796, § 1.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - The provisions of this Code section were previously enacted in substantially similar form by Ga. L. 1967, p. 3022, §§ 1-3, and Ga. L. 1981, p. 3196, § 1. However, those provisions were not enacted as part of the original Code by the Code enactment Act (Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8).

Law reviews. - For annual survey of law of real property, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 319 (1986). For annual survey of recent developments, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 473 (1986).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in DOT v. City of Atlanta, 255 Ga. 124, 337 S.E.2d 327 (1985).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Lease to private entity prohibited absent express authority. - Property held by a municipality for the public use and the benefit of the municipality's citizens cannot be leased to a private entity without express legislative authority in the absence of other applicable exceptions. 1992 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U92-9.

36-37-6.2. Purchase or other acquisition of real property on time or partly for cash; securing of balance; limitation on liability.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term "governing body" means the mayor and city council, the commissioner and commissioners, or either or both as the case may be, or the "governing body" by whatever name called of any city coming under this Code section.

(b) Any city in this state having a population of 200,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1920 or any future such census may, through its governing body, purchase on time or partly for cash, with the balance on time or deferred payments, or otherwise acquire any real property or interest in real property within or outside the limits of such city, securing the note or claim for deferred payments and interest thereon with mortgages or deed of trust on the land purchased or with or by means of an instrument in writing retaining title thereto in the vendor, or enter into any other contractual arrangement whereby provision is made that such note, claim, or other instruments for deferred payment and interest thereon, and all lawful charges, shall not be a charge or charges against the general credit of the city, or be a general liability thereof, but that the liability shall only extend to and be a charge against the land so purchased or acquired. Such method of acquisition provided for in this Code section shall not be considered or deemed exclusive but shall be cumulative and in addition to all other methods of acquisition of lands or interests therein for public purposes provided heretofore, hereafter, or by other provisions of this Code section.

History

(Ga. L. 1929, p. 303, §§ 1, 2; Code 1981, § 36-37-6.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 41; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - The provisions of this Code section were previously enacted in substantially similar form by Ga. L 1929, p. 303, §§ 1 and 2. However, those provisions were not enacted as part of the original Code by the Code enactment Act (Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8).

36-37-7. Disposition of public utility plants or properties - Power generally; effect of charter restrictions.

Statute text

Municipalities are empowered and authorized, if they so desire, to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any or all electric, water, gas, or other municipally owned public utility plants or properties, on such terms and conditions as such municipalities deem proper, and to transfer title to such public utility properties by warranty deed, bill of sale, contract, or lease, in the manner provided by law; provided, however, that nothing contained in this Code section and Code Sections 36-37-8 through 36-37-10 shall be held or construed to affect the powers of any municipal corporation in the charter of which there is now contained any provision either authorizing or prohibiting the sale, lease, or other disposition of such properties by the municipality, so long as such provision remains in the charter of the municipality.

History

(Ga. L. 1925, p. 177, § 1; Code 1933, § 91-901.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Sections do not limit authority of city to dispose of property under charter. - Language in a city charter authorizing the city to dispose of property the city owns "in any manner whatsoever" is not limited by the provisions of former Code 1933, §§ 91-901 through 91-904 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-37-7 through 36-37-10). Singer v. City of Cordele, 225 Ga. 323, 168 S.E.2d 138 (1969).

Cited in Brown v. Mayor, 199 Ga. 234, 33 S.E.2d 705 (1945).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 508 et seq.

C.J.S. - 63 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1152 et seq., 1162, 1165. 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2493.

ALR. - Sufficiency of compliance with condition of sale or lease by municipality of public utility plants, 52 A.L.R. 1052.

Power of municipality to sell, lease, or mortgage public utility plant or interest therein, 61 A.L.R.2d 595.

36-37-8. Disposition of public utility plants or properties - Notice of intent to dispose; petition objecting to disposition; election and notice.

Statute text

Notice of intention to make such sale, lease, or other disposition of a municipal waterworks or electric or gas plant, setting out the price and other general terms and conditions of the proposed sale, lease, or disposition, shall be given by publication once a week for three consecutive weeks in some newspaper published in the municipality and, if no newspaper is published in the municipality, then in some newspaper published in the county in which the municipality is located and, if there is no such newspaper, then in some newspaper having a general circulation in the municipality. After ten days from the last publication of such notice, the plant may be disposed of unless, within ten days after the last publication of the notice, a petition signed by not less than 20 percent of the qualified voters of the municipality is filed, objecting to and protesting against the sale, lease, or disposition. If the petition, so signed, is filed, the sale shall not be made unless submitted to a special election ordered for the purpose of determining whether a majority, which shall constitute two-thirds of those voting at the election, favors the sale, lease, or other disposition. Such election shall be ordered by the municipality to be held not less than 50 days after the date of the filing of the objecting petition with the municipality. The election shall be held in accordance with and in all respects be governed by the Acts of the General Assembly in regard to elections to determine whether municipalities shall issue bonds or not. The notice of the election shall state its purpose.

History

(Ga. L. 1925, p. 177, § 2; Code 1933, § 91-902.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 509.

C.J.S. - 63 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1152 et seq., 1162, 1165.

ALR. - Sufficiency of compliance with condition of sale or lease by municipality of public utility plants, 52 A.L.R. 1052.

36-37-9. Disposition of public utility plants or properties - Ballots for election.

Statute text

The ballots provided for the election shall have plainly written or printed thereon the words "Shall the waterworks, electric, or gas plant (as the case may be), be sold, leased, or disposed of (as the case may be)?" Beside such words shall be suitably placed, on separate lines, the words "Yes" and "No," so that the voter may indicate the way he desires to vote on the question submitted.

History

(Ga. L. 1925, p. 177, § 3; Code 1933, § 91-903; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36.)

36-37-10. Disposition of public utility plants or properties - Proposed disposition determined by two-thirds vote.

Statute text

If two-thirds of those voting in the election vote in favor of such sale, lease, or disposition, the proper officers of the municipal corporation may proceed to sell, lease, or dispose of such plant in accordance with the terms and conditions set out in the notice of proposed intention to sell, lease, or dispose of such plant. If such election is determined against the sale, lease, or disposition of the plant, the plant shall not be sold, leased, or disposed of but shall remain the property of the municipality.

History

(Ga. L. 1925, p. 177, § 4; Code 1933, § 91-904.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Sufficiency of compliance with condition of sale or lease by municipality of public utility plants, 52 A.L.R. 1052.

——————————

CHAPTER 38

BONDS

Article 1

General Provisions.

36-38-1. Investment of funds acquired by tax levied to pay bonded indebtedness generally.

36-38-2. Sale of municipal bonds and use of proceeds for retirement of earlier bonds.

36-38-3. Registration of bonds in which municipal funds invested in name of municipal corporation.

36-38-4. Registration of bonds in name of owner.

Article 2

Compromise of Bonded Debt.

36-38-20. Authority to compromise bonded debt; rights of dissenting creditors not prejudiced.

36-38-21. Issuance of new bonds for outstanding bonds.

36-38-22. Issuance and exchange of bonds; contractual effect of ordinance.

36-38-23. Sinking funds for redemption of new bonds; appointment of commission to manage fund; contractual effect of ordinance.

——————————

ARTICLE 1

GENERAL PROVISIONS

36-38-1. Investment of funds acquired by tax levied to pay bonded indebtedness generally.

Statute text

Every municipal corporation and the officer or officers of any municipal corporation in this state who are charged with the custody of funds raised in pursuance of Article IX, Section V, Paragraph VI of the Constitution of this state are required, under the direction of the mayor and council of the municipal corporation or a duly constituted and authorized committee of the same, to invest, within six months from their collection, all sums collected by the municipal corporation under the requirements of such paragraph of the Constitution, for the purpose of paying the principal of the bonded indebtedness of the municipal corporation, which sums are not actually payable on such principal within 12 months from the date of collection thereof. Such sums may be invested in valid outstanding bonds of such municipal corporation or of some other municipal corporation in this state of equal or larger size, which bonds have been duly validated in accordance with law, or in county bonds of this state which have been duly validated, or in valid outstanding bonds of this state or of the United States. The officer or officers of the municipal corporation shall keep such funds so invested in such bonds, with the privilege of changing the investment from one character of the bonds named to another from time to time as the mayor and council may direct, until such time before the maturity of outstanding obligations as may be necessary to dispose of the same in order to meet such obligations at maturity.

History

(Ga. L. 1910, p. 100, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, §§ 87-701, 87-702; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 57.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For note discussing and comparing the prudent man rule and the legal list rule in trustee investment, see 15 Mercer L. Rev. 530 (1964).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Under this section, the municipality is "required" to invest the funds as stipulated. No discretion is left to the municipal authorities. Century Indem. Co. v. Fidelity & Deposit Co., 175 Ga. 834, 166 S.E. 235 (1932).

Law with regard to investment of sinking funds of municipality differs from that in case of funds held by county treasurer. Century Indem. Co. v. Fidelity & Deposit Co., 175 Ga. 834, 166 S.E. 235 (1932).

Loan of sinking fund. - If the fund is loaned to a bank on a time certificate, by the municipal officers, such contract of loan is illegal and void, as contrary to this section, and will not preclude the municipality from taking steps, before the maturity of such certificate, to compel the bank to turn over the certificate to the city, such bank being the designated depository of the funds of the city, and having knowledge that the fund so loaned is the sinking fund of the city. Hogansville Banking Co. v. City of Hogansville, 156 Ga. 855, 120 S.E. 604 (1923).

No contract exists when funds deposited in violation of section. - When a sinking fund, collected by taxation for the purpose of retiring bonded indebtedness, is deposited in a bank in violation of the provisions of this section, no effectual contract exists between the bank and the municipality as a depositor. The municipality cannot attempt to legalize the attempted contract by a later ratification. Town of Douglasville v. Mobley, 169 Ga. 53, 149 S.E. 575 (1929).

Cited in Union Banking Co. v. City of Douglas, 175 Ga. 82, 165 S.E. 54 (1932); Union Banking Co. v. City of Douglas, 177 Ga. 637, 171 S.E. 131 (1933).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 2184, 2185.

ALR. - Liability of officer for loss of sinking fund through failure of bank, 25 A.L.R. 1358.

36-38-2. Sale of municipal bonds and use of proceeds for retirement of earlier bonds.

Statute text

Whenever a municipal corporation invests its sinking fund in bonds issued by itself, if such bonds mature at a date beyond the maturity of other bonds of such municipal corporation such later bonds may be sold by the municipal corporation or the sinking fund commission and the funds therefrom used to retire earlier municipal bonds as they mature.

History

(Ga. L. 1923, p. 123, § 3a; Code 1933, § 87-703; Ga. L. 1935, p. 417, § 2.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For note discussing and comparing the prudent man rule and the legal list rule in trustee investment, see 15 Mercer L. Rev. 530 (1964).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 2186, 2187.

36-38-3. Registration of bonds in which municipal funds invested in name of municipal corporation.

Statute text

Whenever and as soon as the sinking fund of any municipal corporation has been invested in municipal, county, state, or federal government bonds as required by Code Section 36-38-1, the officer or officers of such municipal corporation charged with the custody of its funds and securities shall proceed forthwith to have the securities in which such funds are so invested registered in the name of the municipal corporation, provided such bonds by their terms under the conditions of their issue are capable of being registered in the name of the owner.

History

(Ga. L. 1910, p. 100, § 4; Code 1933, § 87-704.)

36-38-4. Registration of bonds in name of owner.

Statute text

Every issue of municipal bonds shall provide that at the owner's option the same may be registered in the owner's name, both as to principal and interest.

History

(Ga. L. 1910, p. 100, § 5; Code 1933, § 87-705.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2180.

——————————

ARTICLE 2

COMPROMISE OF BONDED DEBT

36-38-20. Authority to compromise bonded debt; rights of dissenting creditors not prejudiced.

Statute text

The authorities of any municipal corporation of this state are authorized to compromise their bonded debt, in accordance with this article, provided that this article shall not be construed to prejudice the rights of such creditors as may refuse to assent to the compromise.

History

(Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 85, § 1; Code 1882, § 508m(2); Civil Code 1895, § 758; Civil Code 1910, § 905; Code 1933, § 87-501.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 707, 708.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2528 et seq.

ALR. - Estoppel to deny validity of municipal bonds issued under an unconstitutional statute, 37 A.L.R. 1310.

Negotiability of municipal bonds as affected by reference to fund from which they are to be paid, 42 A.L.R. 1027.

36-38-21. Issuance of new bonds for outstanding bonds.

Statute text

Where there are outstanding bonds and coupons of any municipal corporation of this state, whether such bonds or coupons are due or to become due, the authorities may issue new bonds with coupons attached, to be exchanged and to stand in the place of such outstanding bonds and coupons, provided that the new bonds so issued shall not exceed in amount the previously existing total bonded debt, with interest thereon, of such municipal corporation.

History

(Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 85, § 2; Code 1882, § 508m(3); Civil Code 1895, § 759; Civil Code 1910, § 906; Code 1933, § 87-502.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 2186, 2187.

ALR. - Estoppel to deny validity of municipal bonds issued under an unconstitutional statute, 37 A.L.R. 1310.

36-38-22. Issuance and exchange of bonds; contractual effect of ordinance.

Statute text

When the authorities of a municipal corporation desire to avail themselves of the benefit of Code Sections 36-38-20 and 36-38-21 and this Code section, they are authorized and empowered to pass any ordinance or ordinances to provide for the issuance and exchange of new bonds to stand in the place and stead of outstanding bonds and coupons, to determine the mode and method of such issuance and exchange, and to fix the length of time such new bonds shall run and the rate of interest they shall bear. Such ordinance or ordinances shall have the force and effect of contracts between the municipal corporation and those who may receive or hold such new bonds so issued and exchanged.

History

(Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 85, § 3; Code 1882, § 508m(4); Civil Code 1895, § 760; Civil Code 1910, § 907; Code 1933, § 87-503.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Estoppel to deny validity of municipal bonds issued under an unconstitutional statute, 37 A.L.R. 1310.

36-38-23. Sinking funds for redemption of new bonds; appointment of commission to manage fund; contractual effect of ordinance.

Statute text

If any municipal corporation availing itself of this article desires to provide a sinking fund for the redemption of such new bonds, the authorities may pass all ordinances necessary for that purpose and create a commission for the management of such sinking fund and its proper use and application. The commission shall be composed of not less than three nor more than five residents of the municipal corporation. The ordinance or ordinances providing for the sinking fund and for the commission, along with its management and application, the mode of appointing the members thereof, and its duties, shall have the force and effect of law and shall be held and considered as part of the contract between the municipal corporation and the acceptors or holders of the new bonds.

History

(Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 85, § 4; Code 1882, § 508m(5); Civil Code 1895, § 761; Civil Code 1910, § 908; Code 1933, § 87-504.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, §§ 5, 305.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2181 et seq.

ALR. - Liability of officer for loss of sinking fund through failure of bank, 25 A.L.R. 1358.

Constitutional provisions against impairment of obligations of contract as applied to sinking funds for retirement of municipal or other public bonds, 115 A.L.R. 220.

Existing sinking fund as a factor in determining whether indebtedness or proposed indebtedness of municipality or other political subdivision exceeds constitutional or statutory limit, 125 A.L.R. 1393.

——————————

CHAPTER 39

STREET IMPROVEMENTS

Sec.

36-39-1. Definitions.

36-39-2. Adoption of chapter; election; effect of adoption of chapter generally.

36-39-3. Procedure for improvements; adoption and publication of resolution; filing of petition by landowners; objections to improvements.

36-39-4. Basis of assessments for improvements; municipal corporation owner of intersecting streets fronting improvement; payment of assessments on frontage.

36-39-5. Improvements when county owns abutting property.

36-39-6. Paving by railroad having tracks in street.

36-39-7. Payment for street improvements and construction of water, gas, and sewer connections; payment of costs of connections.

36-39-8. Resolution letting contract for improvements following time for protests or filing of petition.

36-39-9. Work performed by municipal corporation; property owners' objections to performance of work by municipal corporation.

36-39-10. Publication and contents of notice of contract proposals.

36-39-11. Examination of bids and award of contract; readvertisement for bids.

36-39-12. Appointment of board of appraisers to appraise and apportion cost.

36-39-13. Filing of board of appraisers' report.

36-39-14. Hearing upon board of appraisers' report; review of report and objections; ordinance fixing assessments; taxation of interest.

36-39-15. Time and manner of payment of assessments generally.

36-39-16. Payment of assessment in installments.

36-39-17. Assessments where portion of costs paid by municipal corporation.

36-39-18. Additional assessments.

36-39-19. Publication and contents of notice of due date of assessment; effect of failure to publish notice.

36-39-20. Lien for assessment and interest.

36-39-21. Execution, levy, and sale on unpaid assessments or interest generally.

36-39-22. Affidavit contesting amount of execution; trial by superior court; penalties for delay.

36-39-23. Collection and use of assessments generally; special fund; treasurer's bond.

36-39-24. Limitation period for contesting or enjoining assessments.

36-39-25. Issuance of bonds; payment; interest; terms; form.

36-39-26. Sale of bonds; delivery to contractors.

36-39-27. Disposition of proceeds from bonds remaining after payment.

36-39-28. Petition for validation of ordinance establishing assessments; time; contents.

36-39-29. Order to show cause on petition; time and notice of hearing.

36-39-30. Conduct of hearing; issuance of order by court.

36-39-31. Appeal from judgment of court.

36-39-32. Conclusiveness of superior court's final judgment.

36-39-33. Entry of reference to judgment on bonds following validation; use of entry as evidence.

36-39-34. Construction of chapter.

Annotations

Cross references. - Acquisition of property by counties, municipalities, or other governmental entities for transportation purposes generally, T. 32, C. 3.

Powers of municipalities with respect to municipal street systems generally, § 32-4-90 et seq.

Editor's notes. - Paragraph (11.1) of Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36, effective November 1, 1982, repealed this chapter, but that repealer was in turn repealed by Ga. L. 1982, p. 502, § 2, effective November 1, 1982.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - This chapter is not unconstitutional on the ground that it is in conflict with Ga. Const. 1877, Art. I, Sec. IV, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. IV). Wheat v. City of Bainbridge, 168 Ga. 479, 148 S.E. 332 (1929).

This chapter is not unconstitutional on the ground that it is general in its nature but not uniform in its operation, because it is made an alternative method of procedure, and its application is dependent upon its adoption by a favorable vote of the electors, whereas the Constitution does not contemplate the enactment of a law general in its nature, the application of which shall be optional with the municipality, either under a prior local law or a local law enacted subsequent to such general law. Wheat v. City of Bainbridge, 168 Ga. 479, 148 S.E. 332 (1929).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Governmental tort liability for injury to roller skater allegedly caused by sidewalk or street defects, 58 A.L.R.4th 1197.

Legal aspects of speed bumps, 60 A.L.R.4th 1249.

36-39-1. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Frontage" means that side or limit of the lot or parcel of land in question which abuts on the improvement.

(2) "Governing body" means the mayor and council, board of aldermen, board of commissioners, or other chief legislative body of a municipal corporation.

(3) "Improve" and "improvement" include the grading, regrading, paving, repaving, macadamizing, and remacadamizing of streets, alleys, sidewalks, or other public places or ways and the construction, reconstruction, and altering of curbing, guttering, storm sewers, turnouts, water mains, and water, gas, or sewer connections therein.

(4) "Municipal corporation" means any city or town incorporated in this state, having a population of 600 or more.

(5) "Pave" includes storm draining, paving, macadamizing, and grading.

(6) "Streets" means streets, avenues, alleys, sidewalks, and other public places or ways.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 1; Code 1933, § 69-401.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 39 Am. Jur. 2d, Highways, Streets, and Bridges, § 1 et seq. 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 1, 3.

C.J.S. - 39A C.J.S., Highways, §§ 1, 211, 218. 40 C.J.S., Highways, § 250 et seq. 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1 et seq.

ALR. - Scope and import of term "owner" in statutes relating to real property, 2 A.L.R. 778; 95 A.L.R. 1085.

Obligation for local improvements as within municipal debt limit, 33 A.L.R. 1415.

Right of municipality to hasten flow of surface water along natural drain ways by improvements of street or highway, 36 A.L.R. 1463.

Assessment of right of way other than that of railroad or street railway for street or local improvement, 58 A.L.R. 127.

Power to impose cost of maintenance or operation of street lighting system on local improvement district, 60 A.L.R. 272.

Underground conduits for electric wires as local improvements supporting special assessments, 66 A.L.R. 1389.

Character of improvement contemplated by statute, ordinance, or contract relating to "surface" or "resurface" of highway, 84 A.L.R. 1158.

Special assessments: What constitutes reconstruction or the like, as distinguished from repair, of pavement, 41 A.L.R.2d 613.

36-39-2. Adoption of chapter; election; effect of adoption of chapter generally.

Statute text

The governing body of any municipal corporation in this state is authorized to hold an election or elections, at such time and under such conditions as may be determined by the governing body, for the purpose of adopting this chapter. When such election has been duly held, if a majority of the qualified electors voting therein voted in favor of such adoption, the election managers shall duly certify the results of the election to the governing body and the same shall be adopted and entered on the minutes thereof. Thereupon, the governing body of the municipal corporation shall be authorized and empowered to improve any street or streets in such municipal corporation whenever, in the judgment of the governing body, the public welfare or convenience requires such improvement, subject only to the conditions and limitations prescribed in this chapter.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 2; Code 1933, § 69-402.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 39 Am. Jur. 2d, Highways, Streets, and Bridges, § 77.

C.J.S. - 39A C.J.S., Highways, § 43 et seq. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1902.

ALR. - Estoppel of municipality to open or use street, 171 A.L.R. 94.

36-39-3. Procedure for improvements; adoption and publication of resolution; filing of petition by landowners; objections to improvements.

Statute text

(a) Whenever the governing body deems it necessary to improve any street or part thereof within the limits of the municipal corporation, either in length or in width, it shall, by resolution, declare such improvement necessary to be done and shall publish such resolution once a week for at least three consecutive weeks in the newspaper in which the sheriff's advertisements of the county in which the municipal corporation is located are published. If the owners of a majority of the lineal feet of frontage of the lands abutting on the proposed improvement, within 15 days after the last day of publication of the resolution, do not file with the clerk of the municipal corporation their protest in writing against the improvement, the governing body shall have the power to cause the improvement to be made, to contract therefor, and to make assessments and fix liens as provided for in this chapter. Any number of streets or any part or parts thereof to be so improved may be included in one resolution. Any protest or objection shall be made as to each street separately.

(b) If the owners of a majority of the lineal feet of frontage of the land liable to assessment for the improvement petition the governing body for the improvement, citing this chapter and designating by general description the improvement to be undertaken and the street or streets or part thereof to be improved, it shall thereupon be the duty of the governing body to proceed, as provided in this chapter, to cause such improvement to be made in accordance with the prayers of the petition and their own best judgment. In such cases the resolution mentioned in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be required. The petition shall be lodged with the clerk of the municipal corporation, who shall investigate the sufficiency thereof, submit the petition to the governing body, and certify the result of his investigation.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 3; Code 1933, § 69-403.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Editor's notes. - In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, decisions under Ga. L. 1921, p. 212 are included in the annotations for this Code section.

Certificate of chief of construction is prima facie evidence. - By Ga. L. 1921, p. 212, the certificate of the chief of construction that the petition was signed by the owners of more than 50 percent of the property abutting on the street or portion of the street sought to be paved is made prima facie evidence of this fact. Ga. L. 1919, p. 821, makes this prima facie presumption conclusive, if the owners do not file objections to the passage of the preliminary ordinance providing for the payment. Montgomery v. City of Atlanta, 162 Ga. 534, 134 S.E. 152 (1926) (decided under Ga. L. 1921, p. 212).

Cited in City of La Grange v. Pound, 50 Ga. App. 219, 177 S.E. 762 (1934); Carter v. City of Toccoa, 210 Ga. 167, 78 S.E.2d 487 (1953).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 26 Am. Jur. 2d, Eminent Domain, §§ 67, 68. 39 Am. Jur. 2d, Highways, Streets, and Bridges, §§ 44, 103, 106, 198.

C.J.S. - 29A C.J.S., Eminent Domain, § 37 et seq. 39A C.J.S., Highways, § 43 et seq. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1282, 1805 et seq.

ALR. - Validity of promise based on invalid paving assessment, 20 A.L.R. 1326.

Lack of or defects in petition of property owners for local improvement as affecting validity or enforcement of assessment, 95 A.L.R. 116.

Failure of property owner to avail himself of remedy provided by statute or ordinance as precluding attack based on improper inclusion of property in, or exclusion of property from, assessment, 100 A.L.R. 1292.

Utilization, under new proceeding for public improvement, of work done under a previously abandoned or invalid proceeding, 110 A.L.R. 278.

Cotenancy as factor in determining representation of property owners in petition for, or remonstrance against, public improvement, 3 A.L.R.2d 127.

Power of municipality or other governmental unit to make contract or covenant exempting or releasing property from special assessment, 47 A.L.R.2d 1185.

Widening of city street as local improvement justifying special assessment of adjacent property, 46 A.L.R.3d 127.

36-39-4. Basis of assessments for improvements; municipal corporation owner of intersecting streets fronting improvement; payment of assessments on frontage.

Statute text

(a) Each lot or parcel of land abutting upon the improvement shall be charged on a basis of lineal foot frontage at an equal rate per foot of such frontage with its just pro rata share of the entire cost of the improvement, less any amounts paid by street or steam railways or others; provided, however, that the cost of the sidewalks, curbs, and gutters shall be charged entirely to the lots or parcels of land abutting on that side of the street upon which the same are constructed.

(b) The frontage of intersecting streets shall be assessed as real estate abutting upon the improvement and the municipal corporation, for all purposes of this chapter, shall be deemed to be the owner thereof. The mayor or chairman of the board of commissioners of the municipal corporation shall have authority to sign the petition or file the objections provided for in this chapter as to improvements affecting such frontage. The governing body of the municipal corporation shall pay from the municipal corporation treasury, as other current bills are paid, its just pro rata share of the entire cost of such an improvement, unless the owners of a majority of the frontage in the petition provided for in subsection (b) of Code Section 36-39-3 agree to pay the entire cost of the improvement or unless in the resolution provided for in subsection (a) of Code Section 36-39-3 it is stated that the entire cost of the improvement is to be paid by the owners of the abutting property.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 4; Code 1933, § 69-404.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Obligation to pay for proportionate part of cost of public improvements may be created by law under authority given or by express contract. City of Hogansville v. Daniel, 52 Ga. App. 12, 182 S.E. 78 (1935).

Mistake of law by municipality will not raise implied obligation on part of property owner to pay for improvement. - When there is no legal liability resting on a citizen and abutting property owner to pay for public improvements or paving of a street, the law will not raise an implied obligation or quasi-contract to pay to the municipality making the improvements for the increased value of the owner's property arising because of the paving, even though the municipality at the time of the making of the improvements was laboring under a mistake of law as to the municipality's authority to levy assessments against the abutting property owner to pay for a proportionate part of the cost of making the improvements. City of Hogansville v. Daniel, 52 Ga. App. 12, 182 S.E. 78 (1935).

Immediate use of improvement to benefit abutting property not necessary. - Assessment against property for public improvements is not illegal because the improvement may not be immediately used beneficially in connection with the abutting property in its present condition. Incorporated Invs., Inc. v. City of Atlanta, 176 Ga. 509, 168 S.E. 10 (1933).

Property owner may be estopped to raise issue of confiscation. - When a city has obtained jurisdiction to make an assessment, and all the provisions of the act authorizing the assessment have been complied with, the property owner has been given fair opportunity to object, but fails to do so, and stands by and sees the improvement made without entering objection, the owner is estopped to raise the question of confiscation. City of McRae v. Folsom, 191 Ga. 272, 11 S.E.2d 900 (1940).

RESEARCH REFERENCES
